New Jersey, session 221, A1194.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State criteria for determining whether a child has a specific learning disability under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. s.1400 et seq., shall: (1)   permit the use of a process based on the childs response to scientific, research-based intervention; (2)   permit the use of other alternative research-based procedures; and (3)   effective July 1, 2023, prohibit the use of a severe discrepancy between intellectual ability and achievement for determining whether a child has a specific learning disability. b.   The State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section.  The regulations shall permit the use of methodologies for determining whether a child has a specific learning disability that are consistent with the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.